California statutes. Civil Code
(h) A fee shall not be charged for the filing of a declaration of nonmonetary status pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2924m.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Prospective owner-occupant” means a natural person who presents to the trustee an affidavit or declaration, pursuant to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that:

(A) They will occupy the property as their primary residence within 60 days of the trustee’s deed being recorded.

(B) They will maintain their occupancy for at least one year.

(C) They are not any of the following:

(i) The mortgagor or trustor.

(ii) The child, spouse, or parent of the mortgagor or trustor.

(iii) The grantor of a living trust that was named in the title to the property when the notice of default was recorded.

(iv) An employee, officer, or member of the mortgagor or trustor.

(v) A person with an ownership interest in the mortgagor, unless the mortgagor is a publicly traded company.

(D) They are not acting as the agent of any other person or entity in purchasing the real property.

(2) “Eligible tenant buyer” means a natural person who at the time of the trustee’s sale:

(A) Is occupying the real property as their primary residence.

(B) Is occupying the real property under a rental or lease agreement entered into as the result of an arm’s-length transaction with the mortgagor or trustor, or with the mortgagor or trustor’s predecessor in interest, on a date prior to the recording of the notice of default against the property, and who attaches evidence demonstrating the existence of the tenancy to the affidavit or declaration required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(C) Is not the mortgagor or trustor, or the child, spouse, or parent of the mortgagor or trustor.

(D) Is not acting as the agent of any other person or entity in purchasing the real property. Submission of a bid pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) does not violate this subparagraph.

(E) Has not filed a petition under Chapter 7, 11, 12, or 13 of Title 11 of the United States Code at any time during the period from the date of the trustee’s sale of the property to the 45th day after the trustee’s sale, or the next business day following the 45th day if the 45th day is a weekend or holiday.

(3) “Eligible bidder” means any of the following:

(A) An eligible tenant buyer.

(B) A prospective owner-occupant.

(C) A nonprofit association, nonprofit corporation, or cooperative corporation in which an eligible tenant buyer is a voting member or director.

(D) An eligible nonprofit corporation with all of the following attributes:

(i) It has a determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service affirming its tax-exempt status pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is not a private foundation as that term is defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) It has its principal place of business in California.

(iii) The primary residences of all board members are located in California.

(iv) One of its primary activities is the development and preservation of affordable rental or home ownership housing in California.

(v) It is registered and in good standing with the Attorney General’s Registry of Charities and Fundraisers, pursuant to the Supervision of Trustees and Fundraisers for
 Charitable Purposes Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(E) A limited liability company wholly owned by one or more eligible nonprofit corporations as described in subparagraph (C) or (D).

(F) A community land trust, as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(G) A limited-equity housing cooperative as defined in Section 817.

(H) The state, the Regents of the University of California, a county, city, district, public authority, or public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state.

(4) “Evidence demonstrating the existence of the tenancy” means a copy of the dated and signed rental or lease agreement or, if a copy of the dated and signed rental or lease agreement is not available, then one of the following:

(A) Evidence of rent payments made for the property by the person asserting that they are an eligible tenant buyer for the six months prior to the recording of the notice of default.

(B) Copies of utility bills for the property payable by the person asserting that they are an eligible tenant buyer for the six months prior to the recording of the notice of default.

(b) This section does not prevent an eligible tenant buyer who meets the conditions set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) from being deemed a prospective owner-occupant.

(c) A trustee’s sale of property under a power of sale contained in a deed of trust or mortgage on real property containing one to four residential units pursuant to Section 2924g shall not be deemed final until the earliest of the following:

(1) If a prospective owner-occupant is the last and highest bidder at the trustee’s sale, the date upon which the conditions set forth in Section 2924h for the sale to become final are met. The prospective owner-occupant shall submit to the trustee the affidavit or declaration described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) at the trustee’s sale or to the trustee by 5 p.m. on the next business day following the trustee’s sale.

(2) Fifteen days after the trustee’s sale unless at least one eligible tenant buyer or eligible bidder submits to the trustee either a bid pursuant to
 paragraph (3) or (4) or a nonbinding written notice of intent to place such a bid. The bid or written notice of intent to place a bid shall:

(A) Be sent to the trustee by certified mail, overnight delivery, or another method that allows for confirmation of the delivery date.

(B) Be accompanied by an affidavit or declaration, pursuant to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, identifying the category set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) to which the person or entity submitting the bid or nonbinding written notice of intent belongs and stating that the person meets the criteria for that category. If the winning bid is placed by an eligible bidder described in
 subparagraphs (C) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the affidavit or declaration shall affirm the bidder’s duty to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 2924o for the benefit of tenants occupying the property.

(C) Be received by the trustee no later than 5 p.m. on the 15th day after the trustee’s sale, or the next business day following the 15th day if the 15th day is a weekend or holiday.

(D) Contain a current telephone number and return mailing address for the person submitting the bid or nonbinding written notice of intent.

(3) (A) The date upon which a representative of all of the eligible tenant buyers submits to the trustee a bid in an amount equal to the full amount of the last and highest bid at the trustee’s sale, in the form of cash, a cashier’s check drawn on a
 state or national bank, a cashier’s check drawn by a state or federal credit union, or a cashier’s check drawn by a state or federal savings and loan association, savings association, or savings bank specified in Section 5102 of the Financial Code and authorized to do business in this state. This bid shall:

(i) Be sent to the trustee by certified mail, overnight delivery, or another method that allows for confirmation of the delivery date.

(ii) Be accompanied by an affidavit or declaration, pursuant to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, stating that the persons represented meet the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and that the persons represented are
 all of the eligible tenant buyers.

(iii) Meet either of the following criteria:

(I) Be received by the trustee no later than 5 p.m. on the 15th day after the trustee’s sale, or the next business day following the 15th day if the 15th day is a weekend or holiday.

(II) Be received by the trustee no later than 5 p.m. on the 45th day after the trustee’s sale, or the next business day following the 45th day if the 45th day is a weekend or holiday, if at least one of the eligible tenant buyers submitted a nonbinding written notice of intent to place a bid pursuant to paragraph (2).

(iv) Contain a current telephone number and return mailing address for the person submitting the bid.

(B) If the
 conditions in this paragraph are satisfied, the eligible tenant buyers shall be deemed the last and highest bidder pursuant to the power of sale.

(4) (A) Forty-five days after the trustee’s sale, except that during the 45-day period, an eligible bidder may submit to the trustee a bid in an amount that exceeds the last and highest bid at the trustee’s sale, in the form of cash, a cashier’s check drawn on a state or national bank, a cashier’s check drawn by a state or federal credit union, or a cashier’s check drawn by a state or federal savings and loan association, savings association, or savings bank specified in Section 5102 of the Financial Code and authorized to do business in this state. The bid shall:

(i) Be sent to the trustee by certified mail, overnight delivery, or
 another method that allows for confirmation of the delivery date.

(ii) Be accompanied by an affidavit or declaration, pursuant to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, identifying the category set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) to which the eligible bidder belongs and stating that the eligible bidder meets the criteria for that category.

(iii) Be received by the trustee no later than 5 p.m. on the 45th day after the trustee’s sale, or the next business day following the 45th day if the 45th day is a weekend or holiday, if the eligible bidder submitted a nonbinding written notice of intent to bid pursuant to paragraph (2). Notwithstanding clause (i), on the last day that bids are eligible to be received by the trustee under this clause, the trustee shall not receive any bid that is not sent by certified mail
 with the United States Postal Service or by another overnight mail courier service with tracking information that confirms the recipient’s signature and the date and time of receipt and delivery.

(iv) Contain a current telephone number and return mailing address for the person submitting the bid.

(v) Be limited to a single bid amount and not contain instructions for successive bid amounts.

(B) As of 5 p.m. on the 45th day after the trustee’s sale, if one or more eligible bidders has submitted a bid that meets the conditions in this paragraph, the eligible bidder that submitted the highest bid shall be deemed the last and highest bidder pursuant to the power of sale. The trustee shall return any losing bid to the eligible bidder that submitted it.

(d) The trustee may reasonably rely on affidavits and declarations regarding bidder eligibility received under this section. The affidavit or declaration of the winning bidder shall be attached as an exhibit to the trustee’s deed and recorded. If the winning bidder is not required to submit an affidavit or declaration pursuant to this section, the trustee shall attach as an exhibit to the trustee’s deed a statement that no affidavit or declaration is required by this section, and the lack of an affidavit or declaration shall not prevent the deed from being recorded and shall not invalidate the transfer of title pursuant to the trustee’s deed.

(e) If the conditions set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) for a sale to be deemed final are not met, then:

(1) Not later than 48 hours after the trustee’s sale of
 property under Section 2924g, the trustee or an authorized agent shall post on the internet website set forth on the notice of sale, as required under paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 2924f, the following information:

(A) The date on which the trustee’s sale took place.

(B) The amount of the last and highest bid at the trustee’s sale.

(C) An address at which the trustee can receive documents sent by United States mail and by a method of delivery providing for overnight delivery.

(2) The information required to be posted on the internet website under paragraph (1) shall also be made available not later than 48 hours after the trustee’s sale of property under Section 2924g by calling the telephone number set forth on the notice of sale as
 required under paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 2924f.

(3) The information required to be provided under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be made available using the file number assigned to the case that is set forth on the notice of sale as required under paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 2924f.

(4) The information required to be provided under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be made available for a period of not less than 45 days after the sale of property under Section 2924g.

(5) A disruption of any of these methods of providing the information required under paragraphs (1) and (2) to allow for reasonable maintenance or due to a service outage shall not be deemed to be a violation of this subdivision.

(6) The information to be provided
 by the trustee to eligible bidders or to persons considering whether to submit a bid or notice of intent to bid pursuant to this section is limited to the information set forth in paragraph (1).

(f) Title to the property shall remain with the mortgagor or trustor or successor in interest until the property sale is deemed final as provided in this section.

(g) A prospective owner-occupant shall not be in violation of this section if a legal owner’s compliance with the requirements of Section 2924n renders them unable to occupy the property as their primary residence within 60 days of the trustee’s deed being recorded.

(h) This section shall prevail over any conflicting provision of Section 2924h.

(i) For trustee’s sales where the winning bidder is an
 eligible bidder under this section, the trustee or an authorized agent shall electronically send the following information to the office of the Attorney General within 15 days of the sale being deemed final:

(1) The dates when the trustee’s sale took place and when it was deemed final.

(2) The name of the winning bidder.

(3) The street address and assessor’s parcel number of the subject property.

(4) A copy of the trustee’s deed, as executed, including the attached affidavit or declaration of the winning bidder.

(5) The category set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) to which the eligible bidder belongs.

(j) The
 Attorney General, a county counsel, a city attorney, or a district attorney may bring an action for specific performance or any other remedy at equity or at law to enforce this section.

(k) The Department of Justice shall include a summary of information contained in the reports received pursuant to subdivision (i) in a searchable repository on its official internet website.

(l) The pendency of a determination of finality under subdivision (c) shall not cause termination of any hazard insurance coverage in effect at the time of the trustee’s sale.

(m) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 601, Sec. 10.   (SB 1146)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2924n.

Nothing in this article shall relieve a person deemed the legal owner of real property when the trustee’s deed is recorded from complying with applicable law regarding the eviction or displacement of tenants, including, but not limited to, notice requirements, requirements for the provision of temporary or permanent relocation assistance, the right to return, and just cause eviction requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 202, Sec. 8.   (SB 1079)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2924o.

(a) On and after January 1, 2023, in the case of any real property purchased pursuant to Section 2924m by an eligible bidder described in subparagraphs (C) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of that section, the property shall be subject to a recorded covenant that ensures the property shall be sold at an affordable housing cost, as defined in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or rented at an affordable rent, as defined in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, for lower income households for 30 years from the date the trustee’s deed is issued, or a greater period of time if any of the following apply:

(1) The terms of a federal, state, or local grant, tax credit, or other source of project financing funding
 the purchase or maintenance of the property by an eligible bidder require a longer term.

(2) The property becomes subject to a contract as described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Tenants, if any, of a property purchased pursuant to Section 2924m by an eligible bidder described in subparagraphs (C) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of that section may exercise any rights available at equity or in law, including, without limitation, to defend an unlawful detainer or institute an action to enforce this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, “lower income households” has the same meaning as described in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 642, Sec. 10.   (AB 1837)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2924p.

(a) For purposes of this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(1) Allow for prospective owner-occupants and eligible bidders to have the first opportunity to purchase properties that have been acquired through the foreclosure process by an entity that annually forecloses on 175 or more residential real properties in California.

(2) Promote owner occupancy by enacting legislation consistent with the provisions of the federal First Look program that provides owner-occupants and affordable housing providers an opportunity for their offers to be considered on foreclosed properties prior to other
 offers.

(3) Ensure that the requirements of this section are consistent with the original stated goals of the federal First Look program, which were to expand home ownership opportunities, strengthen neighborhoods and communities, while also providing that sellers are required to respond to offers received during the first look period before accepting or considering investor offers to purchase single-family homes.

(b) For purpose of this section:

(1) “Bundled sale” means the sale of two or more parcels of real property containing one to four residential dwelling units, inclusive, at least two of which have been acquired through foreclosure under a mortgage or deed of trust.

(2) “Eligible bidder” means any of the following:

(A) A prospective owner-occupant.

(B) A nonprofit corporation that meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The nonprofit corporation has a determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service affirming its tax-exempt status pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is not a private foundation as that term is defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) The nonprofit corporation is based in California.

(iii) All of the board members of the nonprofit corporation have their primary residence in California.

(iv) The primary activity of the nonprofit corporation is the development and preservation of affordable rental or home ownership housing in California.

(C) A community land trust based in California, as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as amended by the act amending this subparagraph.

(D) A limited-equity housing cooperative, as defined in Section 817, that is based in California.

(E) The state, the Regents of the University of California, a county, city, district, public authority, or public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the
 state.

(3) “Institution” means any of the following, if that person or entity, during its immediately preceding annual reporting period, as established with its primary regulator, foreclosed on 175 or more residential real properties, containing no more than 4 dwelling units:

(A) A depository institution chartered under state or federal law.

(B) A person licensed pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code.

(C) A person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) “Prospective owner-occupant” means a natural person whose affidavit or declaration under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) states all of the following:

(A) They will occupy the property as their primary residence within 60 days of the trustee’s deed being recorded.

(B) They will maintain their occupancy for at least one year.

(C) They are not any of the following:

(i) The mortgagor or trustor.

(ii) The child, spouse, or parent of the mortgagor or trustor.

(iii) The grantor of a living trust that was named in the title to the property when
 the notice of default was recorded.

(iv) An employee, officer, or member of the mortgagor or trustor.

(v) A person with an ownership interest in the mortgagor, unless the mortgagor is a publicly traded company.

(D) They are not acting as the agent of any other person or entity in purchasing the real property.

(c) All of the following shall apply to sales of real property containing one to four residential dwelling units, inclusive, that is acquired through foreclosure under a mortgage or deed of trust by an institution or that is acquired at a foreclosure sale by an institution:

(1) During the
 first 30 days after the property is listed for sale, the institution shall only accept offers from eligible bidders.

(2) An eligible bidder shall submit with their offer to the institution an affidavit or declaration, pursuant to Section 2015.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that states they are either of the following:

(A) An eligible bidder pursuant to subparagraphs (B) through (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(B) A prospective owner-occupant purchasing the property as a primary residence pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) Any fraudulent statements may be subject to criminal or civil liability.

(4) The institution shall respond, in writing, to all offers received from eligible bidders during the first 30 days after the property is listed for sale before considering any other offers.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, an institution shall not conduct a bundled sale.

(d) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.   (AB 2897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2925.

The fact that a transfer was made subject to defeasance on a condition, may, for the purpose of showing such transfer to be a mortgage, be proved (except as against a subsequent purchaser or incumbrancer for value and without notice), though the fact does not appear by the terms of the instrument.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2926.

A mortgage is a lien upon everything that would pass by a grant of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2927.

A mortgage does not entitle the mortgagee to the possession of the property, unless authorized by the express terms of the mortgage; but after the execution of the mortgage the mortgagor may agree to such change of possession without a new consideration.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2928.

A mortgage does not bind the mortgagor personally to perform the act for the performance of which it is a security, unless there is an express covenant therein to that effect.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2929.

No person whose interest is subject to the lien of a mortgage may do any act which will substantially impair the mortgagee’s security.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2929.3.

(a) (1) A legal owner shall maintain vacant residential property purchased by that owner at a foreclosure sale once that sale is deemed final, or acquired by that owner through foreclosure under a mortgage or deed of trust. A governmental entity may impose a civil fine upon the legal owner of the property for a violation as set forth in this section. The governmental entity is not required to impose a civil fine if the violation is not remedied.

(2) If the governmental entity chooses to impose a fine pursuant to this section, it shall give the legal owner, prior to the imposition of the fine, a notice containing the following information: 

(A) Notice of the alleged violation,
 including a detailed description of the conditions that gave rise to the allegation.

(B) Notice of the entity’s intent to assess a civil fine if the legal owner does not do both of the following:

(i) Within a period determined by the entity, consisting of not less than 14 business days following the date of the notice, commence action to remedy the violation and notify the entity of that action. This time period shall be extended by an additional 10 business days if requested by the legal owner in order to clarify with the entity the actions necessary to remedy the violation.

(ii) Complete the action described in clause (i) within a period of no less than 16 business days following the end of the period set forth in clause (i).

(C) The notice required
 under this paragraph shall be mailed to the address provided in the deed or other instrument as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 27321.5 of the Government Code, or, if none, to the return address provided on the deed or other instrument.

(3) The governmental entity shall provide a period of not less than the time set forth in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) to remedy the violation prior to imposing a civil fine and shall allow for a hearing and opportunity to contest any fine imposed. In determining the amount of the fine, the governmental entity shall take into consideration any timely and good faith efforts by the legal owner to remedy the violation. The maximum civil fine authorized by this section for each day that the owner fails to maintain the property, commencing on the day following the expiration of the period to remedy the violation established by the governmental entity, is as follows:

(A) Up to a maximum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per day for the first 30 days.

(B) Up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day thereafter.

(4) Subject to the provisions of this section, a governmental entity may establish different compliance periods for different conditions on the same property in the notice of alleged violation mailed to the legal owner.

(b) For purposes of this section, “failure to maintain” means failure to care for the exterior of the property, including, but not limited to, permitting excessive foliage growth that diminishes the value of surrounding properties, failing to take action to prevent trespassers or squatters from remaining on the property, or failing to take action to prevent mosquito larvae from growing
 in standing water or other conditions that create a public nuisance.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a governmental entity may provide less than 30 days’ notice to remedy a condition before imposing a civil fine if the entity determines that a specific condition of the property threatens public health or safety and provided that notice of that determination and time for compliance is given.

(d) Fines and penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be directed to local nuisance abatement programs, including, but not limited to, legal abatement proceedings.

(e) A governmental entity may not impose fines on a legal owner under both this section and a local ordinance.

(f) These provisions shall not preempt any local ordinance.

(g) This section shall only apply to residential real property.

(h) The rights and remedies provided in this section are cumulative and in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 202, Sec. 9.   (SB 1079)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2929.4.

(a) Prior to imposing a fine or penalty for failure to maintain a vacant property that is subject to a notice of default, that is purchased at a foreclosure sale, or that is acquired through foreclosure under a mortgage or deed of trust, a governmental entity shall provide the owner of that property with a notice of the violation and an opportunity to correct that violation.

(b) This section
 shall not apply if the governmental entity determines that a specific condition of the property threatens public health or safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 527, Sec. 1.   (SB 1427)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2929.45.

(a) An assessment or lien to recover the costs of nuisance abatement measures taken by a governmental entity with regard to property that is subject to a notice of default, that is purchased at a foreclosure sale, or that is acquired through foreclosure under a mortgage or deed of trust, shall not exceed the actual and reasonable costs of nuisance abatement.

(b) A governmental entity shall not
 impose an assessment or lien unless the costs that constitute the assessment or lien have been adopted by the elected officials of that governmental entity at a public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 527, Sec. 2.   (SB 1427)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2929.5.

(a) A secured lender may enter and inspect the real property security for the purpose of determining the existence, location, nature, and magnitude of any past or present release or threatened release of any hazardous substance into, onto, beneath, or from the real property security on either of the following:

(1) Upon reasonable
 belief of the existence of a past or present release or threatened release of any hazardous substance into, onto, beneath, or from the real property security not previously disclosed in writing to the secured lender in conjunction with the making, renewal, or modification of a loan, extension of credit, guaranty, or other obligation involving the borrower.

(2) After the commencement of nonjudicial or judicial foreclosure proceedings against the real property security.

(b) The secured lender shall not abuse the right of entry and inspection or use it to harass the borrower or tenant of the property. Except in case of an emergency, when the borrower or tenant of the property has abandoned the premises, or if it is impracticable to do so, the secured lender shall give the borrower or tenant of the property reasonable notice of the secured lender’s intent to enter, and enter only
 during the borrower’s or tenant’s normal business hours. Twenty-four hours’ notice shall be presumed to be reasonable notice in the absence of evidence to the contrary.

(c) The secured lender shall reimburse the borrower for the cost of repair of any physical injury to the real property security caused by the entry and inspection.

(d) If a secured lender is refused the right of entry and inspection by the borrower or tenant of the property, or is otherwise unable to enter and inspect the property without a breach of the peace, the secured lender may, upon petition, obtain an order from a court of competent jurisdiction to exercise the secured lender’s rights under subdivision (a), and that action shall not constitute an action within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Borrower” means the trustor under a deed of trust, or a mortgagor under a mortgage, where the deed of trust or mortgage encumbers real property security and secures the performance of the trustor or mortgagor under a loan, extension of credit, guaranty, or other obligation. The term includes any successor-in-interest of the trustor or mortgagor to the real property security before the deed of trust or mortgage has been discharged, reconveyed, or foreclosed upon.

(2) “Hazardous substance” includes all of the following:

(A) Any “hazardous substance” as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 25281 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Any “waste” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 13050 of the Water
 Code.

(C) Petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquefied natural gas, or synthetic gas usable for fuel, or any mixture thereof.

(3) “Real property security” means any real property and improvements, other than a separate interest and any related interest in the common area of a residential common interest development, as the terms “separate interest,” “common area,” and “common interest development” are defined in Sections 4095, 4100, and 4185, or real property consisting of one acre or less which contains 1 to 15 dwelling units.

(4) “Release” means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing into the environment, including continuing migration, of hazardous substances into, onto, or
 through soil, surface water, or groundwater.

(5) “Secured lender” means the beneficiary under a deed of trust against the real property security, or the mortgagee under a mortgage against the real property security, and any successor-in-interest of the beneficiary or mortgagee to the deed of trust or mortgage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 40.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

[2930.]

Section Twenty-nine Hundred and Thirty. Title acquired by the mortgagor subsequent to the execution of the mortgage, inures to the mortgagee as security for the debt in like manner as if acquired before the execution.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2931.

A mortgagee may foreclose the right of redemption of the mortgagor in the manner prescribed by the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2931a.

In any action brought to determine conflicting claims to real property, or for partition of real property or an estate for years therein, or to foreclose a deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien upon real property, or in all eminent domain proceedings under Section 1250.110 et seq., of the Code of Civil Procedure against real property upon which exists a lien to secure the payment of taxes or other obligations to an agency of the State of California, other than ad valorem taxes upon the real property, the state agency charged with the collection of the tax obligation may be made a party. In such an action, the court shall have jurisdiction to
 determine the priority and effect of the liens described in the complaint in or upon the real property or estate for years therein, but the jurisdiction of the court in the action shall not include a determination of the validity of the tax giving rise to the lien or claim of lien. The complaint or petition in the action shall contain a description of the lien sufficient to enable the tax or other obligation, payment of which it secures, to be identified with certainty, and shall include the name and address of the person owing the tax or other obligation, the name of the state agency that recorded the lien, and the date and place where the lien was recorded. Services of process in the action shall be made upon the agency, officer, board, commission, department, division, or other body charged with the collection of the tax or obligation. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the state agency in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 698, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2931b.

In all actions in which the State of California is named a party pursuant to the provisions of Section 2931a and in which real property or an estate for years therein is sought to be sold, the Attorney General may, with the consent of the Department of Finance, bid upon and purchase that real property or estate for years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 698, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

2931c.

The Attorney General may bring an action in the courts of this or any other state or of the United States to enforce any lien to secure the payment of taxes or other obligations to the State of California under the Unemployment Insurance Code, the Revenue and Taxation Code, or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16180) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code or to subject to payment of the liability giving rise to the lien any property in which the debtor has any right, title, or interest. In any action brought under this section the court shall have jurisdiction to determine the priority and effect of the lien in or upon the property, but the
 jurisdiction of the court in such action shall not extend to a determination of the validity of the liability giving rise to the lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

2932.

A power of sale may be conferred by a mortgage upon the mortgagee or any other person, to be exercised after a breach of the obligation for which the mortgage is a security.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2932.2.

With respect to residential real property containing no more than four dwelling units, a mortgagee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall provide to the mortgagor or trustor, before the mortgagor or trustor signs the mortgage or deed of trust, a written disclosure that a third party, such as a family member, HUD-certified housing counselor, or attorney, may record a request to receive copies of any notice of default and notice of sale. A request for notice under this section shall comply with Section 2924b.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 311, Sec. 5.   (AB 2424)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2932.5.

Where a power to sell real property is given to a mortgagee, or other encumbrancer, in an instrument intended to secure the payment of money, the power is part of the security and vests in any person who by assignment becomes entitled to payment of the money secured by the instrument. The power of sale may be exercised by the assignee if the assignment is duly acknowledged and recorded.
